Mississippi, session 2026, SB2850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 57-62-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [For businesses or industries that received or applied for incentive payments prior to July 1, 2005, this section shall read as follows:] 57-62-9.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a qualified business or industry that meets the qualifications specified in this chapter may receive quarterly incentive payments for a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the Department of Revenue pursuant to the provisions of this chapter in an amount which shall be equal to the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll of new direct jobs for a calendar quarter as verified by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, but not to exceed the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer.  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may elect the date upon which the ten-year period will begin.  Such date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the business or industry applied for incentive payments. (2)  (a)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed five (5) years beyond the expiration date of the initial ten-year period if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least three thousand (3,000) new direct jobs within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production; (ii)  Within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production, the average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (a) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (b)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and qualified to receive incentive payments for the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed ten (10) years beyond the expiration date of the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least four thousand (4,000) new direct jobs after qualifying for the additional incentive period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) but before the expiration of the additional period.  For purposes of determining whether the business or industry meets the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i), the number of jobs the business or industry created in order to meet the minimum jobs requirement of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be subtracted from the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i); (ii)  The average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (b) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (3)  In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment shall apply to the MDA.  The application shall be on a form prescribed by the MDA and shall contain such information as may be required by the MDA to determine if the applicant is qualified. (4)  In order to qualify to receive such payments, the establishment applying shall be required to: (a)  Be engaged in a qualified business or industry; (b)  Provide an average salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for this requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of application, and the threshold established upon application will remain constant for the duration of the project; (c)  The business or industry must create and maintain a minimum of ten (10) full-time jobs in counties that have an average unemployment rate over the previous twelve-month period which is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state unemployment rate, as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security or in Tier Three counties as determined under Section 57-73-21. In all other counties, the business or industry must create and maintain a minimum of twenty-five (25) full-time jobs.  The criteria for this requirement shall be based on the designation of the county at the time of the application. The threshold established upon the application will remain constant for the duration of the project.  The business or industry must meet its job creation commitment within twenty-four (24) months of the application approval. However, if the qualified business or industry is applying for incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the business or industry must comply with the applicable job and wage requirements of subsection (2) of this section. (5)  The MDA shall determine if the applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments.  If the applicant is determined to be qualified by the MDA, the MDA shall conduct a cost/benefit analysis to determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net benefit rate applicable for a period not to exceed ten (10) years and to estimate the amount of gross payroll for the period.  If the applicant is determined to be qualified to receive incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the MDA shall conduct a cost/benefit analysis to determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net benefit rate applicable for the appropriate additional period and to estimate the amount of gross payroll for the additional period.  In conducting such cost/benefit analysis, the MDA shall consider quantitative factors, such as the anticipated level of new tax revenues to the state along with the cost to the state of the qualified business or industry, and such other criteria as deemed appropriate by the MDA, including the adequacy of retirement benefits that the business or industry provides to individuals it employs in new direct jobs in this state.  In no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct state benefits.  Once the qualified business or industry is approved by the MDA, an agreement shall be deemed to exist between the qualified business or industry and the State of Mississippi, requiring the continued incentive payment, together with any amount due pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, if applicable, to be made as long as the qualified business or industry retains its eligibility. (6)  Upon approval of such an application, the MDA shall notify the Department of Revenue and shall provide it with a copy of the approved application and the estimated net direct state benefits.  The Department of Revenue may require the qualified business or industry to submit such additional information as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter.  The qualified business or industry shall report to the Department of Revenue periodically to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments.  The qualified business or industry may be audited by the Department of Revenue to verify such eligibility.  In addition, the State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency. (7)  If the qualified business or industry is located in an area that has been declared by the Governor to be a disaster area and as a result of the disaster the business or industry is unable to create or maintain the full-time jobs required by this section: (a)  The Commissioner of Revenue may extend the period of time that the business or industry may receive incentive payments for a period of time not to exceed two (2) years; (b)  The Commissioner of Revenue may waive the requirement that a certain number of jobs be maintained for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months; and (c)  The MDA may extend the period of time within which the jobs must be created for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months. (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, from and after January 1, 2023, if the amount of the incentive payment that a qualified business or industry is eligible to receive under this chapter is less than the amount that the incentive payment would have been if the payment had been calculated using any applicable income tax rates in Section 27-7-5 that were in effect before January 1, 2023, then the qualified business or industry also shall receive a grant equal to the difference between such two (2) amounts.  Further, the term "incentive payment," as such term is used in this chapter, shall be deemed to not refer to or otherwise include any grant payment payable to a qualified business or industry pursuant to this subsection. [For businesses or industries that received or applied for incentive payments from and after July 1, 2005, but prior to July 1, 2010, this section shall read as follows:] 57-62-9.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a qualified business or industry that meets the qualifications specified in this chapter may receive quarterly incentive payments for a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the Department of Revenue pursuant to the provisions of this chapter in an amount which shall be equal to the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll of new direct jobs for a calendar quarter as verified by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, but not to exceed: (i)  Ninety percent (90%) of the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer if the employer provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser; (ii)  Eighty percent (80%) of the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer if the employer provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) but less than one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser; or (iii)  Seventy percent (70%) of the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer if the employer provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of less than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. (b)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may elect the date upon which the ten-year period will begin.  Such date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the business or industry applied for incentive payments. (2)  (a)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed five (5) years beyond the expiration date of the initial ten-year period if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least three thousand (3,000) new direct jobs within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production; (ii)  Within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production, the average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (a) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (b)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and qualified to receive incentive payments for the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed ten (10) years beyond the expiration date of the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least four thousand (4,000) new direct jobs after qualifying for the additional incentive period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) but before the expiration of the additional period.  For purposes of determining whether the business or industry meets the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i), the number of jobs the business or industry created in order to meet the minimum jobs requirement of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be subtracted from the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i); (ii)  The average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (b) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (3)  In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment shall apply to the MDA.  The application shall be on a form prescribed by the MDA and shall contain such information as may be required by the MDA to determine if the applicant is qualified. (4)  (a)  In order to qualify to receive such payments, the establishment applying shall be required to meet the definition of the term "qualified business or industry"; (b)  The criteria for the average annual salary requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of application, and the threshold established upon application will remain constant for the duration of the project; (c)  The business or industry must meet its job creation commitment within twenty-four (24) months of the application approval.  However, if the qualified business or industry is applying for incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the business or industry must comply with the applicable job and wage requirements of subsection (2) of this section. (5)  (a)  The MDA shall determine if the applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments. (b)  If the applicant is determined to be qualified to receive incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the MDA shall conduct a cost/benefit analysis to determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net benefit rate applicable for the appropriate additional period and to estimate the amount of gross payroll for the additional period.  In conducting such cost/benefit analysis, the MDA shall consider quantitative factors, such as the anticipated level of new tax revenues to the state along with the cost to the state of the qualified business or industry, and such other criteria as deemed appropriate by the MDA, including the adequacy of retirement benefits that the business or industry provides to individuals it employs in new direct jobs in this state.  In no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct state benefits.  Once the qualified business or industry is approved by the MDA, an agreement shall be deemed to exist between the qualified business or industry and the State of Mississippi, requiring the continued incentive payment, together with any amount due pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, if applicable, to be made as long as the qualified business or industry retains its eligibility. (6)  Upon approval of such an application, the MDA shall notify the Department of Revenue and shall provide it with a copy of the approved application and the estimated net direct state benefits.  The Department of Revenue may require the qualified business or industry to submit such additional information as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter.  The qualified business or industry shall report to the Department of Revenue periodically to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments.  The qualified business or industry may be audited by the Department of Revenue to verify such eligibility.  In addition, the State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency. (7)  If the qualified business or industry is located in an area that has been declared by the Governor to be a disaster area and as a result of the disaster the business or industry is unable to create or maintain the full-time jobs required by this section: (a)  The Commissioner of Revenue may extend the period of time that the business or industry may receive incentive payments for a period of time not to exceed two (2) years; (b)  The Commissioner of Revenue may waive the requirement that a certain number of jobs be maintained for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months; and (c)  The MDA may extend the period of time within which the jobs must be created for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months. (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, from and after January 1, 2023, if the amount of the incentive payment that a qualified business or industry is eligible to receive under this chapter is less than the amount that the incentive payment would have been if the payment had been calculated using any applicable income tax rates in Section 27-7-5 that were in effect before January 1, 2023, then the qualified business or industry also shall receive a grant equal to the difference between such two (2) amounts.  Further, the term "incentive payment," as such term is used in this chapter, shall be deemed to not refer to or otherwise include any grant payment payable to a qualified business or industry pursuant to this subsection. [For businesses or industries that apply for incentive payments from and after July 1, 2010, this section shall read as follows:] 57-62-9.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a qualified business or industry that meets the qualifications specified in this chapter may receive quarterly incentive payments for a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the Department of Revenue pursuant to the provisions of this chapter in an amount which shall be equal to ninety percent (90%) of the amount of actual income tax withheld for employees with new direct jobs, but in no event more than four percent (4%) of the total annual salary paid for new direct jobs during such period, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes. (b)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may elect the date upon which the ten-year period will begin.  Such date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the business or industry applied for incentive payments. (c)  A qualified business or industry as defined in Section 57-62-5(a)(iii) may elect the date upon which the ten-year period will begin and may elect to begin receiving incentive payments as early as the second quarter after that date.  Incentive payments will be calculated on all jobs above the existing number of jobs as of the date the MDA determines that the applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments.  In the event that the qualified business or industry falls below the number of existing jobs at the time of determination that the applicant is qualified to receive the incentive payment, the incentive payment shall cease until the qualified business or industry once again exceeds that number.  If after forty-eight (48) months, the qualified business or industry has failed to create at least three thousand (3,000) new direct jobs, incentive payments shall cease and the qualified business or industry shall not be qualified to receive further incentive payments. (2)  (a)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed five (5) years beyond the expiration date of the initial ten-year period if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least three thousand (3,000) new direct jobs within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production; (ii)  Within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production, the average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (a) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (b)  A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and qualified to receive incentive payments for the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed ten (10) years beyond the expiration date of the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least four thousand (4,000) new direct jobs after qualifying for the additional incentive period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) but before the expiration of the additional period.  For purposes of determining whether the business or industry meets the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i), the number of jobs the business or industry created in order to meet the minimum jobs requirement of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be subtracted from the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i); (ii)  The average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (b) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (c)  A qualified business or industry * * * that is a project as defined in Section 57‑75‑5(f)(iv)1 shall be entitled to receive incentive payments for the full ten-year period provided for in subsection (1) of this section, regardless of when the qualified business or industry applied for the incentive, if: (i)  The qualified business or industry creates at least three hundred (300) new direct jobs after qualifying for the initial incentive period provided in subsection (1) of this section; (ii)  The average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located, as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county, whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and (iii)  The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (c) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters. (3)  In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment shall apply to the MDA.  The application shall be on a form prescribed by the MDA and shall contain such information as may be required by the MDA to determine if the applicant is qualified. (4)  (a)  In order to qualify to receive such payments, the establishment applying shall be required to meet the definition of the term "qualified business or industry"; (b)  The criteria for the average annual salary requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of application, and the threshold established upon application will remain constant for the duration of the project; (c)  Except as otherwise provided for a qualified business or industry as defined in Section 57-62-5(a)(iii), the business or industry must meet its job creation commitment within twenty-four (24) months of the application approval.  However, if the qualified business or industry is applying for incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the business or industry must comply with the applicable job and wage requirements of subsection (2) of this section. (5)  (a)  The MDA shall determine if the applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments. (b)  If the applicant is determined to be qualified to receive incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the MDA shall conduct an analysis to estimate the amount of gross payroll for the appropriate additional period. Incentive payments, cumulatively, shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the amount of actual income tax withheld for employees with new direct jobs, but in no event more than four percent (4%) of the total annual salary paid for new direct jobs during the additional period, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes.  Once the qualified business or industry is approved by the MDA, an agreement shall be deemed to exist between the qualified business or industry and the State of Mississippi, requiring the continued incentive payment, together with any amount due pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, if applicable, to be made as long as the qualified business or industry retains its eligibility. (6)  Upon approval of such an application, the MDA shall notify the Department of Revenue and shall provide it with a copy of the approved application and the minimum job and salary requirements.  The Department of Revenue may require the qualified business or industry to submit such additional information as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter.  The qualified business or industry shall report to the Department of Revenue periodically to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments.  The qualified business or industry may be audited by the Department of Revenue to verify such eligibility.  In addition, the State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency. (7)  If the qualified business or industry is located in an area that has been declared by the Governor to be a disaster area and as a result of the disaster the business or industry is unable to create or maintain the full-time jobs required by this section: (a)  The Commissioner of Revenue may extend the period of time that the business or industry may receive incentive payments for a period of time not to exceed two (2) years; (b)  The Commissioner of Revenue may waive the requirement that a certain number of jobs be maintained for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months; and (c)  The MDA may extend the period of time within which the jobs must be created for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months. (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, from and after January 1, 2023, if the amount of the incentive payment that a qualified business or industry is eligible to receive under this chapter is less than the amount that the incentive payment would have been if the payment had been calculated using any applicable income tax rates in Section 27-7-5 that were in effect before January 1, 2023, then the qualified business or industry also shall receive a grant equal to the difference between such two (2) amounts.  Further, the term "incentive payment," as such term is used in this chapter, shall be deemed to not refer to or otherwise include any grant payment payable to a qualified business or industry pursuant to this subsection. SECTION 2.  Section 57-62-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-62-13.  (1)  As soon as practicable after the end of a calendar quarter for which a qualified business or industry has qualified to receive an incentive payment, the qualified business or industry shall file a claim for the payment with the Department of Revenue and shall specify the actual number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry for the calendar quarter and the gross payroll thereof.  The Department of Revenue shall verify the actual number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry and compliance with the average annual wage requirements for such business or industry under this chapter.  If the qualified business or industry files a claim for an incentive payment during an additional incentive period provided under Section 57-62-9(2), the Department of Revenue shall verify the actual number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry and compliance with the average annual wage requirements for such business or industry under this chapter.  If the Department of Revenue is not able to provide such verification utilizing all available resources, the Department of Revenue may request such additional information from the business or industry as may be necessary. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the business or industry must meet the salary and job requirements of this chapter for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters prior to payment of the first incentive payment.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 57-62-9, if the business or industry does not maintain the salary or job requirements of this chapter at any other time during the ten-year period after the date the first payment was made, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until such time as the actual verified number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry equals or exceeds the requirements of this chapter for one (1) calendar quarter. (b)  If the business or industry is qualified to receive incentive payments for an additional period provided under Section 57-62-9(2), the business or industry must meet the wage and job requirements of Section 57-62-9(2), for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters prior to payment of the first incentive payment.  If the business or industry does not maintain the wage or job requirements of Section 57-62-9(2), at any other time during the appropriate additional period after the date the first payment was made, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until such time as the actual verified number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry equals or exceeds the amounts specified in Section 57-62-9(2), for one (1) calendar quarter. (3)  An establishment that has qualified pursuant to this chapter may receive payments only in accordance with the provision under which it initially applied and was approved.  If an establishment that is receiving incentive payments expands, it may apply for additional incentive payments based on the new gross payroll for new direct jobs anticipated from the expansion only, pursuant to this chapter. (4)  As soon as practicable after verification of the qualified business or industry meeting the requirements of this chapter and all rules and regulations, the Department of Finance and Administration, upon requisition of the Department of Revenue, shall issue a warrant drawn on the Mississippi Advantage Jobs Incentive Payment Fund to the establishment in the amount of the incentive payment as determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the calendar quarter. SECTION 3.  Section 57-114-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-114-5.  Application for the mFlex tax incentive.  Business or industrial enterprises wishing to apply for the mFlex tax incentive authorized by this chapter shall make application to the authority, on a form prescribed thereby; provided that the application shall, at a minimum, contain: (a)  A brief overview of the applicant's business or industry, including its formation type (e.g., corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, etc.), its date of incorporation or formation thereof, and the location of its principal headquarters, together with its principal place of business in the state, if the applicant already has one or more facilities located in the state; (b)  The location of the selected project site or locations of selected project sites, if multiple locations will be involved; (c)  A description of the proposed project; (d)  The amount of the qualified investment proposed to be made as a result of the proposed project, including a breakout of projected expenditures for manufacturing machinery, nonmanufacturing equipment and component building materials to establish and equip the proposed project; (e)  If the proposed project will be an expansion of an existing business or industrial operation, the current number of base full-time jobs; (f)  The number of new full-time jobs proposed to be created as a result of the proposed project; (g)  The average employer wage proposed to be paid by the applicant for new full-time jobs disclosed in the application; (h)  A description of benefits, including but not limited to, health, dental and/or vision insurance, retirement savings account, etc. made available to employees, as well as a description of any employees to whom such benefits are not made available (e.g., part-time employees); (i)  The length of time necessary for the applicant to meet its qualified investment and new full-time job creation projections; (j)  A list of all affiliates of the qualified business or industry known at the time of the application, including the Federal Employer Identification Number for each such affiliate, which have or are expected to have any state tax liability that may be offset by all or some portion of the mFlex tax incentives awarded to the qualified business or industry; (k)  An acknowledgment that the applicant, if awarded an mFlex tax incentive pursuant to this chapter, will be required to provide the annual report prescribed by Section 57-114-13 to demonstrate the actual amount of its qualified investment, including actual expenditures on manufacturing machinery, nonmanufacturing equipment and component building materials, and the number of new full-time jobs created and maintained as a result of the project; and (l)  Any other information as may be requested by the authority. SECTION 4.  Section 57-114-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-114-7.  (1)  The authority shall evaluate an application to determine whether the applicant's proposed project is a qualified economic development project and whether it is therefore eligible for an award by the authority of an mFlex tax incentive, as calculated in accordance with Section 57-114-9. (2)  Upon approval of an applicant's application, the authority shall issue a certification (a) designating the applicant's project as a "qualified economic development project" and eligible for the mFlex tax incentive authorized by this chapter; (b) awarding the initial mFlex tax incentive calculated pursuant to Section 57-114-9; and (c) imposing those mandatory conditions pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and any discretionary conditions otherwise imposed by the authority. (3)  Upon the issuance of the certification and execution of the mFlex agreement by a qualified business or industry and the authority, the qualified business or industry may apply the amount of its mFlex tax incentive as a credit to offset (a) any state taxes (except for withholding tax required to be deducted and withheld from employee wages pursuant to Section 27-7-301 et seq.), as incurred thereby, up to the full amount of the mFlex tax incentive awarded by the authority for the associated qualified economic development project, and (b) only up to twenty percent (20%) of the mFlex tax incentive amount may be applied as a credit during the course of any reporting year to offset withholding tax deducted and withheld from employee wages pursuant to Section 27-7-301 et seq.; provided that the amount of the mFlex tax incentive available to be applied as a credit to offset such state taxes shall be subject to any subsequent adjustments made by the authority to such award pursuant to Section 57-114-13, and any performance requirements set out in the mFlex agreement.  The amount of the mFlex tax incentive available to be applied as a credit to offset any state taxes described in Section 57-114-3(bb)(i) shall be limited to those such taxes payable directly by the qualified business or industry to the Department of Revenue pursuant to a direct pay permit issued by the Department of Revenue under Section 27-65-93.  The amount of the mFlex tax incentive available to be applied as a credit to offset any state taxes may not be applied as a credit to offset any state taxes incurred prior to the issuance of the certification by the authority and execution of the mFlex agreement by the qualified business or industry and the authority. (4)  The following conditions shall apply to each such certification made, and each mFlex tax incentive awarded, by the authority in accordance with this chapter: (a)  Any certification and mFlex tax incentive award issued by the authority under this chapter is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other person or business or tax account without prior approval by the authority, except for one or more affiliates of the qualified business or industry disclosed thereby on its application or in a subsequent annual report submitted to the authority in accordance with this chapter; (b)  No qualified business or industry may claim or use the mFlex tax incentive awarded thereto under this chapter unless the qualified business or industry is in full compliance with all state and local tax laws, and related ordinances, permits and other applicable governmental approvals; and (c)  Each qualified business or industry must enter into an mFlex agreement with the authority which sets out, at a minimum, (i) the obligation of the business or industry to provide an annual report to the authority pursuant to Section 57-114-13 that demonstrates the actual amount of its qualified investment, including actual expenditures on manufacturing machinery, nonmanufacturing equipment and component building materials, the number of new full-time jobs created and maintained as a result of the project, and any other relevant information as may be required by the authority; and (ii) terms for readjustment or recapture of all or a portion of the mFlex tax incentive awarded thereto pursuant to Section 57-114-13 if the applicant 1. fails to satisfy the minimum job creation requirement if certification of the project is predicated on satisfaction of the minimum job creation requirement and not the minimum qualified investment, or 2. fails to satisfy the minimum qualified investment if certification of the project is predicated on satisfaction of the minimum job creation requirement and not the minimum qualified investment, and/or 3. fails to otherwise satisfy any other additional performance requirements of the qualified business or industry or its qualified economic development project that are imposed by the authority. (5)  In addition to those mandatory conditions prescribed by this chapter that apply to each certification and award of an mFlex tax incentive made by the authority in accordance herewith, the authority is authorized to impose any other conditions upon any certification and award of an mFlex tax incentive made by the authority as it shall find best promotes economic development in the state. (6)  Upon certifying a qualified business or industry as eligible for, and awarding, an mFlex tax incentive under this chapter, the authority shall forward the certification along with any other necessary information to the Department of Revenue so that the mFlex tax incentive awarded to the qualified business or industry can be recorded by the Department of Revenue and used to verify each state tax credit subsequently applied by the qualified business or industry. (7)  Within thirty (30) days following the end of each calendar quarter, the authority shall provide to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a copy of each certification made, together with a copy of each mFlex agreement approved and executed, during the immediately preceding calendar quarter. SECTION 5.  Section 57-114-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-114-9.  Calculation and application of an mFlex tax incentive award.  The total amount of the initial mFlex tax incentive determined and awarded by the authority to the certified applicant shall be calculated by the authority as follows: (a)  Subject to paragraph (f) below, one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the total purchase or sales price, or value, including any installation costs thereof, as applicable, of all manufacturing or processing machinery acquired, leased or otherwise moved into the state following the project certification date to establish and equip the qualified economic development project; plus (b)  Subject to paragraph (f) below, seven percent (7%) of the total purchase or sales price, or value, including any installation costs thereof, as applicable, of all nonmanufacturing equipment, other than tagged over-the-road vehicles, acquired, leased or otherwise moved into the state following the project certification date to establish and equip the qualified economic development project; plus (c)  Subject to paragraph (f) below, two percent (2%) of the total contract price or compensation paid to any contractor pursuant to any construction contract entered into following the project certification date by the qualified business or industry or any affiliate thereof, to construct, build, erect, repair or add to any building, facility, structure or other improvement to real property described in Section 27-65-21(1)(a)(i) to establish and construct the qualified economic development project; plus, if applicable; (d)  To the extent that the average employer wage is equal to or more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the average state or county wage, then an additional fifteen percent (15%) of the product derived by multiplying the average employer wage by the number of new full-time jobs; plus, if applicable; (e)  (i)  To the extent that 1. the qualified economic development project is an enterprise enumerated in Section 57-114-3(x)(i) or (x)(ii); 2. the number of new full-time jobs totals fifty (50) or more; 3. the qualified investment totals Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000) or more; 4. the average employer wage is equal to or more than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the average state or county wage; and 5. all full-time employees are eligible for and offered health insurance coverage funded in whole or at least fifty percent (50%) by the qualified business or industry (or by a leasing company with respect to leased employees), then an additional thirty percent (30%) of the product derived by multiplying the average employer wage by the number of new full-time jobs; or (ii)  To the extent that subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (e) does not apply, but 1. the number of new full-time jobs totals twenty-five (25) or more; 2. the average employer wage is equal to or more than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the average state or county wage; and 3. all full-time employees are eligible for and offered health insurance coverage funded in whole or at least fifty percent (50%) by the qualified business or industry (or by a leasing company with respect to leased employees), then an additional thirty percent (30%) of the product derived by multiplying the average employer wage by the number of new full-time jobs; provided, however, that the initial mFlex tax incentive award amount determined by the authority and awarded on the project certification date shall be based upon estimates provided by the qualified business or industry to the authority with respect to paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section, which estimates shall be memorialized as project performance measures agreed to by the qualified business or industry in the mFlex agreement; provided, further, that such initial award amount shall be subject to any subsequent adjustments made by the authority pursuant to Section 57-114-13; (f)  To the extent that all or any portion of the purchases to establish a qualified economic development project which are financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-201 et seq. or Section 57-10-401 et seq., the mFlex tax incentive determined in accordance with this section shall exclude the amount calculated in accordance with paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) above; provided that, this paragraph (f) shall not apply in determining the mFlex tax incentive for a qualified economic development project to the extent that (i) the qualified economic development project is an expansion of an existing project, (ii) all or any portion of the purchases to establish the existing project were financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-201 et seq. or Section 57-10-401 et seq., and (iii) no purchases to establish the expansion constituting a qualified economic development project are financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-201 et seq. or Section 57-10-401 et seq. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.